Utah statutes.
17B-2a-902.   Provisions applicable to service areas.

(1)  Each service area is governed by and has the powers stated in:

(a)  this part; and

(b)  except as provided in Subsection (5), Chapter 1, Provisions Applicable to All Local Districts.

(2)  This part applies only to service areas.

(3)  A service area is not subject to the provisions of any other part of this chapter.

(4)  If there is a conflict between a provision in Chapter 1, Provisions Applicable to All Local Districts, and a provision in this part, the provision in this part governs.

(5) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (5)(b), on or after December 31, 2012, a service area may not charge or collect a fee under Section 17B-1-643 for:

(i)  law enforcement services;

(ii)  fire protection services;

(iii)  911 ambulance or paramedic services as defined in Section 26-8a-102 that are provided under a contract in accordance with Section 26-8a-405.2; or

(iv)  emergency services.

(b)  Subsection (5)(a) does not apply to:

(i)  a fee charged or collected on an individual basis rather than a general basis;

(ii)  a non-911 service as defined in Section 26-8a-102 that is provided under a contract in accordance with Section 26-8a-405.2;

(iii)  an impact fee charged or collected for a public safety facility as defined in Section 11-36-102; or

(iv)  a service area that includes within the boundary of the service area a county of the fifth or sixth class.



Amended by Chapter 97, 2012 General Session

